Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.07
Licensed project designer, defined.

Licensed project designer means an individual who has been trained by an accredited training program and licensed by the department to prepare abatement project designs, occupant protection plans, and abatement reports.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1267.